Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 2. Provisions Relating to Northeast Interstate Compact for Dairy Pricing

§ 1823.
Secretary: delegation from State of Vermont.

The delegation from the State of Vermont to the Commission established by section 1804 of this title shall consist of five voting members appointed by the Governor, plus the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets who shall be a nonvoting member. Three of the voting members shall be milk producers, one of whom is not a director or officer of any organization which handles or processes dairy products. A fourth voting member shall be a milk handler. The fifth voting member shall be a representative of the public who has resided in the State for at least five years and who has no financial interest in the dairy business other than as a consumer of milk and milk products. Appointed members shall be appointed for staggered three-year terms. Initial appointments may be for less than three-year terms. A delegation member may seek reappointment for two additional terms. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall be a nonvoting member, ex officio. The appointed members shall elect a chair of the Board from among themselves.

The members of the delegation, other than the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, shall receive per diem compensation and expenses in accordance with

32 V.S.A. § 1010

.

The Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall provide administrative work as directed by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§§ 1824-2100.
[Reserved for future use.]

§§ 2101-2122.
Repealed. 1993, No. 57, § 2, eff. June 3, 1993.